Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202623-1114.07
County officers; salaries; Class 6 or 7 counties; exceptions.

Except for members of the county board, salaries of county officers, including appointive full-time veterans service officers, in counties of Class 6 or 7 shall be established by the county board, except that the county assessor in counties of Class 7 shall receive a minimum annual salary of twenty thousand dollars, to be paid periodically as other county employees out of the general fund.

Laws 1961, c. 96, § 7, p. 325;

Laws 1965, c. 106, § 1, p. 430;

Laws 1967, c. 127, § 6, p. 408;

Laws 1969, c. 164, § 6, p. 740;

Laws 1971, LB 574, § 7;

Laws 1972, LB 1157, § 6;

Laws 1973, LB 220, § 7;

Laws 2012, LB772, § 1;

Laws 2024, LB1300, § 43.